Utah statutes.
54-4a-4.   Legal counsel.
The attorney general shall appoint sufficient full time legal counsel to
assist, advise, and represent the division and its staff in the discharge of
its duties and in all proceedings before the Public Service Commission, and in
all other proceedings.
